Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 78a, as
amended by Section 8, Chapter 199, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 78a), is amended to read as follows:
Section 78a. A. State agencies with authority to own motor
vehicles shall submit a requisition to the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services prior to acquisition of a motor
vehicle. The requisition shall state the type of vehicle, the
intended purpose of the vehicle, a statement that the agency has
actual need for the vehicle, the supplier of the vehicle, that the
state agency has sufficient funds to acquire and maintain the
vehicle and cite the statutory authority of the state agency to
acquire a vehicle.
B. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall review the requisition and approve or deny the
request of the state agency within fifteen (15) days of receipt.
C. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall
not apply to the Department of Public Safety, the Commissioners of

the Land Office, the Office of the Attorney General, the Oklahoma
District Attorneys Council, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics
and Dangerous Drugs Control or the Oklahoma Military Department.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1752 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1752 Page 3